Massachusetts, session 194th, H3016.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking
out clause Twenty-second C, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, and inserting in place
thereof the following clause:-
Twenty-second C, Real estate owned and used as the residence or domicile of a soldier,
sailor, or member of the National Guard, who is a veteran as defined in clause 43 of section 7 of
chapter 4, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other than
dishonorable conditions, and who, according to the records of the Veterans Administration, by
reason of such service in the armed forces of the United States, suffered in the line of duty
permanent and total disability, is exempt from taxation; provided, that the soldier, sailor,
member or veteran is a permanent resident of the commonwealth and has legal title to the real
of 3

estate on January 1 of the tax year for which exemption is being claimed. An exemption under
this clause shall continue unchanged for the benefit of the surviving spouse after the death of
such disabled veteran, as long as the surviving spouse of the qualified veteran shall remain an
owner and occupant of a domicile subject to the exemption, until the time such spouse remarries
or sells or otherwise disposes of the real estate; provided, however, that if the spouse sells the
real estate, an exemption not to exceed the amount granted in the most recent tax year may be
transferred to real estate occupied by the surviving spouse as the surviving spouse’s primary
residence or domicile, until the time the surviving spouse remarries.
The production by a veteran or surviving spouse of a letter of total and permanent
disability from the United States Government or United States Department of Veterans Affairs or
its predecessor before the property appraiser of the county in which real estate of the veteran lies
is prima facie evidence of the fact that the veteran or the surviving spouse is entitled to the
exemption.
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of clause Twenty-second D of section 5 of chapter 59,
as amended by section 9 of chapter 141 of the acts of 2016, is hereby further amended by
inserting after the word “however”, the following words:- that the soldier, sailor, member or
veteran was a permanent resident of the commonwealth on January 1 of the year in which they
died; and provided, further,.
SECTION 3. The second paragraph of said clause Twenty-second D of said section 5 of
said chapter 59, as so amended, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “or
remarries” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- remarries or otherwise disposes
of the real estate. If the surviving spouse sells the real estate, an exemption not to exceed the
of 3

amount granted from the most recent tax year may be transferred to real estate occupied by the
surviving spouse as the surviving spouse’s domicile under the same conditions as provided in
this clause.
SECTION 4. Clause Twenty-second F of section 5 of chapter 59, as amended by section
10 of chapter 141 of the acts of 2016, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word
“paraplegics”, in line 866, the following words:-, hemiplegics, or who must use a wheelchair for
mobility.
of 3